District of Columbia statutes.
21-2402.02

Exclusive basis.

This subchapter provides the exclusive jurisdictional basis for the Superior Court to appoint a guardian or issue a protective order for an adult.

Nov. 25, 2008, D.C. Law 17-270, § 2(b), 55 DCR 11018
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 202 of the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.